Tennessee, session 114, SB1949.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "mRNA Bioweapons Prohibition
Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 13, Part 8, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) It is the intent of the general assembly to designate mRNA injections and
products as weapons of mass destruction and to prohibit possession or distribution of
mRNA injections and products in this state.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "mRNA injections and products":
(A) Means:
(i) With regard to COVID-19 injections, mRNA or modified
messenger RNA as related to gene altering agents, with a
structure altered by substituting two N-methyl-pseudouridine
amino acids for the usual uridine components so as to elude
immune destruction of the mRNA, allowing the mRNA that
produces the pathogenic spike protein to exist within cells for a
longer period of time;
(ii) All other injections or products containing mRNA or
modified messenger RNA;
SB1949
010821
- 1 -

(iii) Any human gene therapy product for any infectious
disease indication, regardless of whether the administration is
described as an immunization, vaccine, or otherwise; and
(iv) Nanotechnology or nanoparticles that alter genes and
create a biosynthetic cell replication; and
(B) Does not mean naturally occurring messenger ribonucleic
acid that is a single-stranded molecule of RNA that corresponds to the
genetic sequence of a gene; and
(2) "State or local government official" means the governor, attorney
general and reporter, district attorneys general, county sheriffs, and state and
local law enforcement officers.
(c)
(1) It is an offense for a person to knowingly manufacture, acquire,
possess, or make accessible to another mRNA injections and products.
(2) It is an offense for a state or local government official to fail or refuse
to use all lawful means necessary to investigate or enforce a violation of
subdivision (c)(1) after being provided with reasonable evidence of a violation.
(d) A violation of subdivision (c)(1) or (c)(2) is punishable as a violation of § 39-
13-806.
(e) A resident of this state may seek injunctive relief, declaratory relief, and
economic, non-economic, and punitive damages from the state or a state and local
government official for lack of enforcement of this section.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 010821